Maryland, session 2026, HB0124.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–208.
(a) In addition to the modification under § 10–207 of this subtitle, the amounts
under this section are subtracted from the federal adjusted gross income of a resident to
determine Maryland adjusted gross income.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0124*

HOUSE BILL 124
(DD) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “PERSONAL CASUALTY LOSS” MEANS LOSS
OF PROPERTY THAT:
(I) IS NOT CONNECTED WITH A TRADE OR BUSINESS OR A
TRANSACTION ENTERED INTO FOR PROFIT;
(II) CONSISTS OF ASSETS IN A QUALIFIED RETIREMENT PLAN
UNDER THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE; AND
(III) ARISES FROM THEFT OR A FRAUD SCHEME.
(2) THE SUBTRACTION ALLOWED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION INCLUDES:
(I) THE AMOUNT OF ANY PERSONAL CASUALTY LOSS OF A
TAXPAYER RELATED TO A THEFT OR FRAUD SCHEME THAT OCCURRED DURING THE
TAXABLE YEAR THAT WAS ALLOWED AS A DEDUCTION UNDER § 165 OF THE
INTERNAL REVENUE CODE BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2018; AND
(II) ANY EXPENSES OR PENALTIES INCURRED DURING THE
TAXABLE YEAR RELATED TO THE THEFT OR FRAUD SCHEME.
(3) TO QUALIFY FOR THE SUBTRACTION ALLOWED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION, THE TAXPAYER SHALL ATTACH TO THE TAXPAYER’S TAX RETURN:
(I) A POLICE REPORT ESTABLISHING THAT THE THEFT OR
FRAUD SCHEME OCCURRED; AND
(II) ADDITIONAL EVIDENCE OF THE IMPACTED QUALIFIED
RETIREMENT PLAN ASSETS.
(4) FOR ANY TAXABLE YEAR, THE SUBTRACTION ALLOWED UNDER
THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE REDUCED BY THE AMOUNT OF ANY DEDUCTION FOR
THAT TAXABLE YEAR THAT IS:
(I) RELATED TO THE THEFT OR FRAUD SCHEME;
(II) ALLOWED UNDER § 165 OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE;
AND
(III) ATTRIBUTABLE TO A TAXPAYER’S QUALIFIED RETIREMENT
PLAN LOSSES.

HOUSE BILL 124 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.